src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
salakomme+N:sala%#k˘omB1e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
salakraav+N:sala%#kr˘aav TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salakraavitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sala%#kraavitus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
salakuulaja+N:sala%#k˘uulaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
salakuulamine+N:sala%#k˘uulamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
salakäik+N:sala%#k˘äik%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
salakütus+N:sala%#kütus SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
salaluure+N:sala%#l˘uure PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
salamander+N:sala%#m˘ander%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
salamõte+N:sala%#m˘õtT1e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
salapaik+N:sala%#p˘aik%>%{pl.u%} ASI  "weight: 11 " ; 
salapolitsei+N:sala%#pˈolits˘ei ARMEE  "weight: 10 " ; 
salapolitseinik+N:sala%#polits˘ein˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
salapära+N:sala%#pära KAVA  "weight: 9 " ; 
salapäratseja+N:sala%#päratseja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
salarelv+N:sala%#r˘elv%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
salasepitseja+N:sala%#sepitseja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salasepitsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sala%#sepitsus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
salasoov+N:sala%#s˘oov TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
salasopp+N:sala%#s˘opp TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
salastamine+N:salastamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
salasund+N:sala%#s˘unD1 TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
salasõna+N:sala%#sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@salat REDEL  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salateenistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sala%#teenistus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
salatikast+N:salati%#k˘asʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
salatseja+N:salatseja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salatsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@salatsus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
salatubakas+N:sala%#tubaka LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
salatuisk+N:sala%#t˘uisK1%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
salaviin+N:sala%#v˘iin%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salaviinandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sala%#viinandus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
salaühing+N:sala%#ühing VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@saldejumps+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sˈaldej˘umps TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@saldejums+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sˈaldej˘ums TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
saldo+N:saldo PERE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@saledus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@saledus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
saleduskuur+N:saledus%#k˘uur TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salgamatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘algamatus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘alk%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘alk%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 9 " ; 
salkkond+N:s˘alkk˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 11 " ; 
salklane+N:s˘alklane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sall+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘alʲl TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sallimatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘alʲlimatus SUULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sallitavus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@salʲlitavus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sallivus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘alʲlivus OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘alʲm TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salmiaak+N:@P.Stem.Nom@salʲmi˘aak TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
salmialbum+N:salʲmi%#˘album REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salmik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@salʲmik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
salmimeister+N:salʲmi%#m˘eister%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
salmisepp+N:salʲmi%#s˘epp%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
salmitegija+N:salʲmi%#tegija AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salmonelloos+N:@P.Stem.Nom@salmonell˘oos TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salong+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sal˘ong TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
salongimuusika+N:salˈongi%#muusika AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
salongiõhtu+N:salˈongi%#˘õhtu AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
salooga+N:salooga PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salpeeter+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘alp˘eeter%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
salsa+N:salsa PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
salto+N:salto PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
saltomortaale+N:salto%#mortaale PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@saltser+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘altser REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
salu+N:salu%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA  "weight: 10 " ; 
salumets+N:salu%#m˘ets%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@saluut+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sal˘uut TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘alʲv TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘alv%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT  "weight: 9 " ; 
salvei+N:s˘alv˘ei ARMEE  "weight: 10 " ; 
salvestamine+N:salvestamine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
salvesti+N:salvesti AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salvestis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@salvestis OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salvestus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@salvestus OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
salvrätik+N:s˘alv%#rätʲik VIRSIK  "weight: 10 " ; 
salvrätt+N:s˘alv%#r˘ätʲt TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salvur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘alvur REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
samaaria+N:sam˘aaria AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
samaarialane+N:sam˘aarialane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
samaarialanna+N:samˈaarialanna PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
samaarlane+N:sam˘aarlane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samagonn+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sˈamag˘onʲn TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
samakas+N:samaka LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samalaadsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sama%#l˘aadsus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
samariitlane+N:samar˘iitlane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samariitlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@samar˘iitlus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
samastamine+N:samastamine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@samastus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samasus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@samasus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samataolisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sama%#t˘aolisus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samaväärsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sama%#v˘äärsus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
samba+N:samba PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
samblateadlane+N:s˘ambla%#t˘eadlane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samblateadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘ambla%#t˘eadus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samblik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘ambl˘ik ÄMBLIK  "weight: 10 " ; 
sambo+N:sambo PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sambomaadlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sambo%#m˘aadlus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samet+N:@P.Stem.Nom@samet REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sametisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sametisus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
sametlill+N:samet%#l˘ill%>%{pl.i%} EIT  "weight: 11 " ; 
sametpintsak+N:samet%#pintsak VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
samizdat+N:s˘am%#izd˘at FIAT  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘amm%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 5 " ; 
sammakala+N:samma%#kala%>%{pl.u%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sammal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘amB1A2l PIPAR  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sammas+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘amB1a KOTKAS  "weight: 8 " ; 
sammaskäik+N:sammas%#k˘äik%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
sammaspool+N:sammas%#p˘ool%{stemill%} KEEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
sammastik+N:sˈammast˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
sammuke+N:sammuke PEENIKE  "weight: 9 " ; 
sammulugeja+N:sammu%#lugeja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sammumine+N:s˘ammumine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
sammumõõtur+N:sammu%#m˘õõtur REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samojedoloog+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sˈamojedol˘oog TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
samojedoloogia+N:samojedol˘oogia AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samovar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@samovar TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sampler+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘ampler REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sampus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘ampus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samss+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘amss TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
samssking+N:s˘amss%#k˘ing%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
samurai+N:samur˘ai ARMEE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@samuum+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sam˘uum TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
sanatoorium+N:sanat˘oorium MUUSEUM  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sandaal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sand˘aal TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sandalett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sandal˘etʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sandarm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@sandarm REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
sandarmeeria+N:sandarm˘eeria AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sandhi+N:sandhi PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
sandikepp+N:sanʲdi%#k˘epp TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
sandikopikas+N:sanʲdi%#kopika LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
sandikäru+N:sanʲdi%#käru KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sandlipuit+N:s˘andli%#p˘uit%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
sandlipuu+N:s˘andli%#p˘uu%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sandvitš+N:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘andv˘itš TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
